src/fst/morphology/affixes/exceptional_declinations.lexc
LEXICON KÕRB    ! only kõrb; contains paradigms of 2 words: 
               ! 1) Sg Gen kõrbe = land without plantlife (=desert)
               ! 2) Sg Gen kõrve = uninhabitable forest
               ! meaning (2) is lost today, so kõrve is used as an old wordform for desert...

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! kõrb

! type 1C kõrb-kõrve-kõrbe; like EIT
         +Usage/Rare:%{W%}%>e N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! kõrve etc 
                  :e SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! kõrbe NB! not rare!
                  :e SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! kõrbe NB! not rare!
         +Usage/Rare:e%{W%}%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! kõrvesse 
         +Usage/Rare:e DE_PL ;             ! kõrbede etc 
         +Usage/Rare:i PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! kõrbi
         +Usage/Rare:e%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! kõrbesid

! type 2C kõrb-kõrbe-kõrbet; like REDEL with stem vowel e
                  :%>e N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! kõrbe etc 
         +Usage/Rare:e%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! kõrbet NB! rare!
         +Usage/Rare:e%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! kõrbesse NB! rare!
                  :e TE_PL ;    ! kõrbete etc 
                  :e%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! kõrbeid 

LEXICON KÖÖMEN    ! only köömen; like KEVAD

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! köömen
                  :e 2C ;    ! köömne etc  
+Usage/CommonNotNorm:%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! kööment

LEXICON KÜMMEND   ! only kümmend; like KÖÖMEN? SEEME?

                  :nd SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! kümmend
                  :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! (viit)kümmet
         +Usage/Rare:nd SG_PARTITIVE ;     ! (viit)kümmend
                  :ne 2C_STRONG ;      ! (viie)kümne etc
                  :ne TE_PL ;        ! (viie)kümnete

LEXICON LAPS    ! only laps, uks; notice the weird (?) use of {W}

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! laps
                  :e N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! lapse etc 
                  :%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! last
                  :e%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! lapsesse 
                  :%{W%} TE_PL ;    ! laste etc 
                  :%>i PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! lapsi

LEXICON LAPSELAPS    ! only lapselaps; the N_PL_SUBPARA is different...

                  :lapse#l˘aP1s SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! laps
                  :lapse#l˘aP1se N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! lapse etc 
                  :lapse#l˘aP1s%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! last
                  :lapse#l˘aP1se%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! lapsesse 
                  :laste#l˘aP1s%{W%} TE_PL ;    ! laste etc 
                  :lapse#l˘aP1s%>i PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! lapsi

LEXICON LAPSELAPSELAPS    ! only lapselapselaps; the N_PL_SUBPARA is different...

                  :lapse#lapse#l˘aP1s SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! laps
                  :lapse#lapse#l˘aP1se N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! lapse etc 
                  :lapse#lapse#l˘aP1s%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! last
                  :lapse#lapse#l˘aP1se%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! lapsesse 
                  :laste#laste#l˘aP1s%{W%} TE_PL ;    ! laste etc 
                  :lapse#lapse#l˘aP1s%>i PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! lapsi

LEXICON LÕUNA    ! only lõuna; almost like haare

                  :%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;      ! lõuna
                  :%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! lõunat
                  : 2C_STRONG ;         ! lõuna, lõunasse etc
                  : TE_PL ;                 ! lõunate


LEXICON MANNER    ! VVS 3 only manner, tanner
                  ! almost = VAHER, but stem vowel is i

                  :%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! manner
                  :i 2C ;    ! mandri etc

LEXICON MEES    ! only mees

                  :es SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! mees
                  :he N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! mehe etc 
                  :es%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! meest
                  :he%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! mehesse 
                  :es TE_PL ;    ! meeste etc 
                  :h%>i PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! mehi

LEXICON MERI    ! VVS 20 unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) 8 words (lumi, tuli, uni, veri...)

                  :i SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  :%>d SG_PARTITIVE ;        ! merd
                  :e N_SG_SUBPARA ;          ! meres etc
                  :e%{S%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;     ! merre
                  :e SG_ILL_VARIANT ;         ! meresse 
                  :e DE_PL ;
                  :e%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;   
                  :e LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON MESI     ! VVS 15 unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) 8 words

                  :i SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! mesi
                  :e%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! mee etc 
                  :%>tt SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! mett
                  :%{S%}%>tte SG_ILL_VARIANT ;  ! vette, kätte
                  :e%{W%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;    ! meesse
                  :%{W%} TE_PL ;    ! mete etc 
                  :i PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! mesi ?? meesid ???
      !   +Usage/Hyp: N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! mesil? etc; except for some expressions (käsil) ?

LEXICON MÕRU     ! only mõru; KAVA & HALE

                   : KAVA ;
       +Usage/NotNorm:da 2C ;    ! haleda, mõruda
                   :da US_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON NAINE    ! only naine; much like OLULINE
                  
                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  : NE_S_COMMON ;
                  :E1%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! naisesse
                  :%>I1 PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! naisi
      +Usage/Rare+Pl:%>I1 LOCATIVES_PLUS ;    ! naisil etc

LEXICON NIIN    ! only niin; almost like KEEL, but some forms are more regular

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! niin
                  :e%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;    ! niine etc 
                  :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! niint
                  :e%{W%}%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! niinesse 
                  : TE_PL ;    ! niinte etc 
    !   +N+Usage/Hyp:%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! impossible for rarer words
                  :e%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! NB! niinesid (not niini, as the ÕS norm states)

LEXICON NIMI    ! VVS 20, 21 unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) 17 words; suvi, lagi
                ! almost = KAVA, but last vowel changes i -> e 

                  :i SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  :e%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;     ! nime, lae etc
                  :e SG_PARTITIVE ;           ! nime, suve, lage
                  :e%{S%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;     ! lakke
                  :e%{W%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;    ! laesse 
                  :e DE_PL ;
                  :e%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;   
!                 :e%{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON OSA    ! only osa

                  : KAVA ;
         +Usage/Rare:%{W%}%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! osil etc

LEXICON PARAS    ! only paras; like LOHAKAS
 
                  :s SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! paras
                  :ja 2C ;    ! paraja etc
                  :ja US_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON PEEN    ! only peen; almost like KEEL, but some forms are more regular

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;       ! peen
                  :%>e N_SG_SUBPARA ;     ! peene etc 
                  :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;     ! peent
         +Usage/Rare:e%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! peenet
         +Usage/Rare:%{S%}%>de SG_ILLATIVE ;     ! peende
                  :e%{W%}%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! peenesse 
                  : TE_PL ;    ! peente etc 
         +Usage/Rare:e TE_PL ;     ! peenete etc 
                  :e%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;     ! peeneid 
         +Usage/Rare:i PL_PARTITIVE ;         ! peeni
       +Usage/Hyp+Pl:%{W%}%>i LOCATIVES_PLUS ;    ! peenil etc
                  : US_DERIVATION ;


LEXICON PERSE    ! only perse

                  :e%{stemill%} PINGE ;
         +Usage/Rare:se%{stemill%} 2C_STRONG ;

LEXICON POISS    ! only poiss, püks; like KAEL; almost = TAUD, except pl gen + 

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  :%{sg.i%} 1C_SG ;                 ! poisi etc
                  :%{W%} TE_PL ;  ! poiste etc
         +Usage/Rare:%>%{sg.i%} DE_PL ;    ! poisside etc
                   :%>%{pl.e%}%{sg.i%}%>%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR_VARIANT ;


LEXICON PURI    ! only puri

                  : EIT ;
         +Usage/Rare:e%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! purjeid

LEXICON PUU    ! 11 words (kuu, maa, etc) that have possible vowel plural forms 
               ! only if the Pl Par with -id is more frequent than -sid (puid vs puusid),
               ! then the word may have vowel plural forms

                  : ARMEE ;
         +Usage/Rare:%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! puil etc

LEXICON PÕLV    ! only põlv; similar to talv and rohi

                  :v%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
         +Usage/Rare:i SG_NOMINATIVE ;               ! põli
      +Usage/Rare+Pl:v%>i LOCATIVES_PLUS ;    ! põlvil etc
      +Pl+Usage/Rare:v%>i%>ni TERMINATIVE ;       ! põlvini

LEXICON PÕRSAS   ! only põrsas

                  :a KOTKAS ;               ! põrsas, põrsa etc
         +Usage/Rare:sa 2C_STRONG ;           ! põrssa etc

LEXICON PÄEV    ! only päev, -kond

                  : PIIM ;
         +Usage/Rare:%{W%}%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! päevil etc

LEXICON PÄIKE    ! only päike(ne), äike(ne)  VVS 10

                  : XÄIKE ;
                  :kese%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;    ! päikeseid
         +Usage/Rare:kse%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;     ! päikseid

LEXICON REHI    ! rehi, ruhi; similar to rohi

                  : EIT ;
         +Usage/Rare:%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! reht, ruht

LEXICON RIND    ! only rind

                  : PIIM ;
      +Pl+Usage/Rare:%>e GENITIVE;    ! rinde
      +Usage/Rare+Pl:%{W%}%>u LOCATIVES_PLUS ;    ! rinnus etc

LEXICON RUBLA    ! about 20 words 

                  : PERE ;
         +Usage/Rare: SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! (viis) rubla

LEXICON RUUM    ! only ruum, piir

                  : TAUD ;
      +Usage/Rare+Pl:%{W%}%>e LOCATIVES_PLUS ;    ! ruumes etc

LEXICON SADA    ! only sada

                  : KAVA ;
         +Usage/Rare:%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! sadat

LEXICON SEEME    ! only kümme, seeme, kööme; like HAARE

                  :%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;       ! seeme
                  :%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;     ! seemet
                  :ne 2C_STRONG ;     ! seemne etc, seemnete etc
                  :ne TE_PL ;                 ! seemnete

LEXICON SILM    ! only silm

                  : PIIM ;
      +Pl+Usage/Rare:%>e GENITIVE;    ! silme
         +Usage/Rare:%{W%}%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! silmis etc

LEXICON SINANE    ! only (see)sinane; like SOOLANE, but additionally parallel forms sinatse-

                  :sinane SOOLANE ;
         +Usage/Rare:sinats NE_S_COMMON ;
         +Usage/Rare:sinatsE1%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;            ! soolasesse, katusesse
         +Usage/Rare:sinatsE1%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! soolaseid, katuseid
         +Usage/Rare:sinatsE1%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! soolaseil, katuseil etc

LEXICON SÜDA    ! only süda; like HAARE

                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;          ! süda
                  :n%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;       ! südant NB! Not südat 
                  :me TE_PL ;  ! südamete etc
                  :me 2C_STRONG ;         ! südame etc

LEXICON TALV    ! only talv; similar to rohi and põlv (põli)

                  :v%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT ;
         +Usage/Rare:i SG_NOMINATIVE ;              ! tali

LEXICON TEINE    ! only teine; almost = NAINE; much like OLULINE
                  
                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
                  : NE_S_COMMON ;
                  :E1 SG_ILLATIVE ;                ! teise (should be 3rd grade... )
                  :%>I1 PL_PARTITIVE ;             ! teisi
                  : LINE_US_RARE ;              ! teisesse, teisil etc

LEXICON TEIST    ! only -teist(kümmend); much like KÜMMEND
                  
                  : SG_NOMINATIVE ;            ! viisteist
         +Usage/Rare:#kümmend SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! viisteistkümmend
                  : SG_PARTITIVE ;             ! viitteist
         +Usage/Rare:#kümme%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! viitteistkümmet
         +Usage/Rare:#kümmend SG_PARTITIVE ;     ! viitteistkümmend
         +Usage/Rare: SG_GENITIVE ;              ! viieteist
                  :#kümne 2C_STRONG ;          ! viieteistkümne etc
                  :#kümne TE_PL ;              ! viieteistkümnete
